Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5152.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3208. Notice that the a mortgage will be foreclosed under this chapter by a sale of the mortgaged premises, or some part of them, shall the premises, must be given by publishing doing all of the following: (a) Publishing the same notice for 4 successive weeks at least once in each week , in a newspaper published in the county where the premises included in the mortgage and intended to be sold, or some part of them, the premises, are situated. located. If no newspaper is published in the county, the notice shall must be published in a newspaper published in an adjacent county. In every case within (b) For residential property described in section 3214(9), before the first publication of the notice under subdivision (a), recording a true copy of the notice with the register of deeds for the county or counties in which the premises are located. (c) Not later than 15 days after the first publication of the notice under subdivision (a), posting a true copy shall be posted of the notice in a conspicuous place upon on any part of the premises described in the notice. Sec. 3214. (1) Except as provided in subsection (10), if a mortgagor, the mortgagor's heirs or personal representative, or any person that has a recorded interest in the mortgaged premises that was obtained before a notice of foreclosure is recorded under section 3208(b) conveys the mortgaged premises after the notice of foreclosure is recorded and before the foreclosure sale is conducted under section 3216, the grantee is liable to the grantor for damages as provided in this section unless the grantee provides a notice of rights that satisfies all of the requirements of subsection (2) to the grantor before execution of the instrument of conveyance, but not before the cooling-off period under subsection (3) has elapsed. (2) All of the following apply to a notice of rights required under subsection (1): (a) The notice must be a separate document from the instrument of conveyance and any other document. (b) The notice must be printed in not less than 14-point boldfaced type. (c) The notice must be signed and dated by each grantor. (d) A copy of the fully executed notice, signed and dated by all parties, must be provided to each grantor at the time of signing. (e) Before presenting the notice to the grantor for signature, the grantee must complete all blanks in the notice, including all property value disclosures required by the notice language under subsection (8). A notice presented with any required blank unfilled does not satisfy the requirements of this section. (f) The notice must identify the property by street address and by each tax parcel identification number assigned to the property. If the property consists of more than 1 parcel, the notice must list every parcel identification number. If no street address or parcel identification number has been assigned, the notice must include the legal description of the property. A good-faith error in, or omission of, a parcel identification number does not, by itself, make the notice noncompliant or give rise to liability under subsection (5) if the property is otherwise reasonably identified in the notice. (3) A grantee shall not present an instrument of conveyance subject to this section, or an agreement, option, or contract to convey an interest subject to this section, to the grantor for execution before 7 days after the grantor signed the notice of rights required under subsection (1). An instrument of conveyance, or an agreement, option, or contract to convey an interest, executed in violation of this 7-day cooling-off period is a per se willful violation under subsection (5)(c). This 7-day cooling-off period is mandatory and cannot be waived. (4) The existence of a notice signed under this section is not a defense against a claim of fraud, duress, misrepresentation, or unconscionability, and does not preclude any other remedy at law or equity available to the grantor. (5) A grantee who fails to provide a notice of rights as required under subsection (1) is liable to the grantor for damages as follows: (a) The measure of damages is the fair market value of the premises at the time of conveyance less the outstanding mortgage balance as stated in a notice of foreclosure recorded under section 3208(b) less the consideration actually paid by the grantee to the grantor. As used in this subdivision, "consideration actually paid" means cash or cash equivalent actually received by the grantor at or before closing, not including any amounts paid by the grantee directly to satisfy the mortgage or other liens encumbering the premises. (b) The grantor bears the initial burden of establishing a reasonable estimate of the fair market value of the premises at the time of conveyance by competent evidence. Competent evidence includes, but is not limited to, a retrospective appraisal by a licensed appraiser and comparable sales data for similar properties in the same area within a reasonable time of the conveyance. Upon the grantor establishing a reasonable estimate of fair market value, the burden shifts to the grantee to rebut that estimate by a preponderance of the evidence. (c) If the court finds that the violation was willful, the court shall award 2 times the damages calculated under subdivision (a). A violation is presumed willful if any of the following apply: (i) The grantee is a person other than an individual, and the grantee's stated or apparent business purpose involves acquiring distressed or foreclosed properties. (ii) The grantee, or a beneficial owner or controlling person of the grantee, has acquired more than 1 interest in mortgaged premises during a foreclosure gap period within the 3 years preceding the conveyance at issue. (iii) The notice of rights was backdated, as established by any evidence, including, but not limited to, document metadata, witness testimony, or inconsistency with other transaction documents. (iv) The grantee took affirmative steps to prevent the grantor from seeking legal counsel, including, but not limited to, requiring same-day signing, misrepresenting the nature of the documents, or representing that the notice of rights was not required. (v) The grantee failed to record the instrument of conveyance and the notice of rights not later than 120 days after execution. (d) In addition to damages under subdivision (a) or (c), the court shall award the grantor reasonable attorney fees and costs if the grantor prevails. (6) An individual who is a beneficial owner of, or who exercises control over the management or operations of, an entity that is subject to this section is jointly and severally liable with the entity for all damages and attorney fees awarded under this section. A beneficial owner or controlling person is presumed to have had actual knowledge of the recorded notice of foreclosure at the time of the conveyance. This presumption may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence. (7) It is an affirmative defense to liability under this section that the grantee had no actual knowledge of the recorded notice of foreclosure at the time the instrument of conveyance was executed. For purposes of this subsection, a grantee who conducted a bona fide search of the register of deeds index before closing and found no recorded foreclosure notice is presumed to have had no actual knowledge of the pending foreclosure. (8) A notice of rights required under subsection (1) must contain the following language: NOTICE TO SELLER: READ THIS DOCUMENT CAREFULLY. YOU ARE SELLING YOUR HOUSE WHILE IT IS IN FORECLOSURE. THIS IS A LEGAL AND FINANCIALLY SIGNIFICANT DECISION. YOU SHOULD SEEK LEGAL COUNSEL OR CONTACT A HUD-CERTIFIED HOUSING COUNSELOR BEFORE SIGNING ANY DOCUMENTS. PROPERTY THIS NOTICE CONCERNS STREET ADDRESS: ______________________________ TAX PARCEL IDENTIFICATION NUMBER(S): ______________________________ (IF THIS PROPERTY CONSISTS OF MORE THAN ONE PARCEL, LIST EVERY PARCEL IDENTIFICATION NUMBER ABOVE. THIS NOTICE COVERS ALL PARCELS LISTED.) LEGAL DESCRIPTION (REQUIRED ONLY IF NO STREET ADDRESS OR PARCEL NUMBER HAS BEEN ASSIGNED; MAY BE ADDED IN ANY CASE): ______________________________ PROPERTY VALUE DISCLOSURE (TO BE COMPLETED BY THE BUYER) 1. CURRENT STATE EQUALIZED VALUE (SEV): $__________________ (This amount is a matter of public record available from the local assessor.) 2. APPROXIMATE MARKET VALUE (SEV x 2): $__________________ (Multiplying the SEV by 2 provides an estimate of the property's market value. This figure is an estimate only and may not reflect actual market value. You are encouraged to obtain an independent appraisal before signing.) 3. PURCHASE PRICE OFFERED: $__________________ 4. OUTSTANDING MORTGAGE BALANCE FROM FORECLOSURE NOTICE: $__________________ (Amount claimed to be due on the mortgage at the date of the notice, as published under section 3208 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.3208.) 5. ESTIMATED EQUITY FORFEITED (Line 2 MINUS Line 4 MINUS Line 3): $__________________ (This is the approximate net amount of equity you are giving up, after accounting for the purchase price you are receiving.) This document serves as a formal notice of certain rights that will be forfeited upon the sale of this property. By signing a deed and completing the sale of the property, you will be waiving and relinquishing rights you may have under statute, as follows: 1. Right of Redemption: By selling the property, you permanently waive any and all rights to redeem or reclaim the property. The right of redemption allows a mortgagor, the property owner, to reclaim a foreclosed property by paying off the outstanding debt within a legally specified redemption period. This right is irrevocably forfeited upon your completion of the sale. 2. Right to Occupancy During the Redemption Period: You further acknowledge that any rights to remain in the property during the redemption period will no longer be available to you. Once the conveyance is complete, you forfeit any and all rights to continue occupying the property. 3. Right to Surplus Proceeds: Your home may be worth more than the outstanding balance of your mortgage. If the home is sold at public auction, and the sale price is greater than the balance of the mortgage, you may be entitled to collect the remaining sale proceeds. By selling the property before the public auction, you will have no right to collect the surplus proceeds that may have resulted from the auction sale. By signing a deed or instrument of conveyance, which by law may not be presented to you for signature until at least 7 days after the date you sign this notice, you will be waiving all of the above rights provided to you by statute. YOU HAVE A 7-DAY COOLING-OFF PERIOD. BY LAW, YOU CANNOT BE ASKED TO SIGN THE DEED OR INSTRUMENT OF SALE UNTIL 7 DAYS AFTER YOU HAVE SIGNED THIS NOTICE. THIS PERIOD IS TO GIVE YOU TIME TO UNDERSTAND YOUR RIGHTS AND SEEK HELP. WARNING: THIS DOCUMENT MAY NOT BE BACKDATED. SIGNING THIS DOCUMENT WITH A FALSE DATE IS FRAUD UNDER MICHIGAN LAW AND MAY RESULT IN CRIMINAL PROSECUTION AND CIVIL LIABILITY. (9) This section applies only to residential property that does not exceed 4 units. For purposes of this section, property that is used in part for nonresidential purposes is residential property only if the residential use is the principal use of the property. (10) This section does not apply if the grantee is the person foreclosing the mortgage or is a person that has an interest in the property that is subordinate to the interest of the person foreclosing the mortgage. (11) It is an affirmative defense to liability under subsection (5) that the grantee provided the grantor a notice of rights that contained all completed property value disclosures required under subsection (8), the grantor signed and dated the notice, the cooling-off period under subsection (3) was observed, and the defect did not mislead or prejudice the grantor. (12) Not later than 30 days after execution of an instrument of conveyance that is subject to this section, the grantee shall record the instrument, with the fully executed notice of rights required under subsection (1) attached, with the register of deeds for the county or counties in which the premises are located. (13) A grantee that fails to comply with subsection (12) is liable to the grantor for a civil penalty of $50.00 for each day the failure continues, beginning on the thirty-first day after execution and ending on the date the instrument and attached notice are recorded, not to exceed $25,000.00 for each instrument, and liable for reasonable attorney fees and costs if the grantor prevails. A penalty under this subsection is in addition to, and not instead of, any liability under subsection (5). (14) The period of limitations for an action under subsection (5) does not begin to run until both the instrument of conveyance and the notice of rights required under subsection (1) are recorded as required under subsection (12). Sec. 3222. If a notice of foreclosure is recorded under section 3208(b) and a sale scheduled in a notice under section 3212 is cancelled by the party foreclosing the mortgage, a notice cancelling the notice of foreclosure must be recorded with the register of deeds for the county or counties in which the premises are located not later than 30 days after the sale is canceled. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5153 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.